Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 7. Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan.

§ 25-11-301.
Creation and management of supplemental legislative retirement plan.

There is hereby established and placed under the management of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi a supplemental legislative retirement plan for the purpose of providing supplemental retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this article for elected members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate and their beneficiaries. The retirement plan provided by this article shall go into operation on July 1, 1989, when contributions by members shall begin and benefits shall become payable. This retirement plan is designed to supplement and is in addition to the provisions of Section 25-11-1 et seq. Under the terms of this article, the members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate shall retain all social security benefits under Article 1 and additional state retirement and disability benefits under Article 3 of the Public Employees’ Retirement Law of 1952, as amended. This article is a supplement to those sections, and is designed to provide more benefits for members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate by reason of their service to the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 25-11-303.
Applicable definitions.

For the purposes of this article, the definitions in Section 25-11-5 and Section 25-11-103 shall apply unless a different meaning is plainly expressed by the context.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 25-11-305.
Membership.

The membership of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan shall be composed as follows:

All members of the State Legislature who are currently serving in the capacity of an elected official of the State Legislature and the person currently serving as President of the Senate shall become members of this system on July 1, 1989, unless they file with the board within thirty (30) days after July 1, 1989, on a form prescribed by the board, a notice of election not to be covered in the membership of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan and a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits which would otherwise inure to them on account of their participation in the plan.

All members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate who are elected after July 1, 1989.

Any state legislators who would have otherwise qualified for membership in the plan under subsection (1) of this section but who were excluded from membership by other provisions of this section as it read before March 26, 1991, shall become members of the plan upon March 26, 1991, and shall receive creditable service in the plan for the period from July 1, 1989, to March 26, 1991, upon payment of the proper employee and employer contributions for that period.

Membership in the plan shall cease by a member withdrawing his accumulated contributions, or by a member withdrawing from active service with a retirement allowance, or by death of the member.

No benefits under the plan shall accrue or otherwise be payable to any person who does not qualify for membership in the plan under subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 5; Laws, 1991, ch. 445 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1991).

§ 25-11-307.
Custodian of fund; financing; expense.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall act as custodian of the funds for members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate, and shall receive to the credit of such fund all donations, bequests, appropriations, and all funds available as an employer’s contribution thereto from any source whatsoever. The State Legislature shall each month deduct from the compensation of each member three percent (3%) thereof, and shall pay the amount so deducted to the board of trustees to be credited to the fund for the members. The compensation of each member shall include all remuneration or amounts paid, except mileage allowance. From the funds credited to this account, the board of trustees shall pay retirement allowances, disability benefits, survivors’ benefits and expenses, and shall refund contributions as provided. The fund for the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan shall be maintained as a separate fund, separate from all other funds held by the board of trustees and shall be used only for the payment of benefits provided for by the plan, or amendments thereto.

On account of each member there shall be paid monthly into the fund for members of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan by the State Legislature from funds available an amount equal to a certain percentage of the compensation of each member to be known as the “normal contributions,” and an additional amount equal to a percentage of his compensation to be known as the “accrued liability contribution.” The percentage rate of such contributions shall be fixed by the board of trustees on the basis of the liabilities of the plan for the various allowances and benefits as shown by the actuarial valuation. Until changed by the board of trustees, the contribution rate shall be six and one-third percent (6-1/3%) of the annual compensation of all members, which shall include all remuneration or amounts paid, except mileage allowance.

The board of trustees is hereby authorized to deduct two percent (2%) of all employer’s contributions paid into the fund for members of the State Legislature and the President of the Senate to be transferred to the expense fund of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to defray the cost of administering this fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 6; Laws, 1989, ch. 583, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 21; Laws, 2000, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 2000).

§ 25-11-309.
Retirement allowance under plan; waiver of benefits.

The retirement allowance from the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan shall consist of fifty percent (50%) of an amount equal to the retirement allowance determined by creditable service as an elected Senator or Representative of the State Legislature or as President of the Senate payable by the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with Section 25-11-101 et seq.

The percentage of the retirement allowance as provided in this section shall be transferred from the annuity savings account of the member and the employer accumulation account in the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan to the retirement account of the member in the Public Employees’ Retirement System as provided.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section or this title to the contrary, the maximum annual retirement allowance attributable to the employer contributions payable under the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan to a member shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued thereunder applicable to governmental plans as the term is defined under Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits as provided under this chapter to members or beneficiaries of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement System at a time and under circumstances not otherwise provided for in this chapter to the extent that the payment is required to maintain the Supplemental Legislative Retirement System as a qualified retirement plan for purposes of federal income tax laws.

A retiree or beneficiary may, on a form prescribed by and filed with the Executive Director of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, irrevocably waive all or a portion of any benefits from the plan to which the retiree or beneficiary is entitled under this article. The waiver shall be binding on the heirs and assigns of any retiree or beneficiary and the same must agree to forever hold harmless the plan and the Public Employees’ Retirement System from any claim to the waived retirement benefits.

Any waiver under this subsection shall apply only to the person executing the waiver. A beneficiary shall be entitled to benefits according to the option selected by the member at the time of retirement; however, a beneficiary may execute a waiver of benefits under this subsection.

The plan shall retain all amounts that are not used to pay benefits because of a waiver executed under this subsection.

The board of trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may provide rules and regulations for the administration of waivers under the subsection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 20; Laws, 2000, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 15; Laws, 2007, ch. 348, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 25-11-311.
Refund of contributions; death prior to retirement; reelection after receiving refund.

A member may be paid a refund of the amount of accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account, provided the member has withdrawn from state service and further provided the member has not returned to state service on the date the refund of the accumulated contributions would be paid. The refund of the contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account shall be paid within ninety (90) days from receipt in the office of the retirement system of the properly completed form requesting that payment. In the event of death before retirement of any member whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance, the accumulated contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be paid to the designated beneficiary on file in writing in the office of the executive director of the board of trustees within ninety (90) days from receipt of a properly completed form requesting that payment. If there is no such designated beneficiary on file for the deceased member in the office of the system, upon the filing of a proper request with the board, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be refunded under Section 25-11-311.1(1). The payment of the refund shall discharge all obligations of the retirement system to the member on account of any creditable service rendered by the member before the receipt of the refund. By the acceptance of the refund, the member shall waive and relinquish all accrued rights in the plan.

Pursuant to the Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1992 (Public Law 102-318 (USCS)), a member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary making application for a refund under this section may elect, on a form prescribed by the board under rules and regulations established by the board, to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions payable under this section paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account. If the member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary makes that election and specifies the eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account to which the distribution is to be paid, the distribution will be made in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the specified eligible retirement plan. A nonspouse beneficiary may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions paid in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account established to receive the distribution on behalf of the nonspouse beneficiary. Flexible rollovers under this subsection shall not be considered assignments under Section 25-11-129.

If any person who has received a refund, is reelected to the Legislature or as President of the Senate and again becomes a member of the plan before July 1, 2007, the member may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least four (4) years after the member’s reentry into state service. Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system.

If any person who has received a refund, reenters the state service and again becomes a member of the system on or after July l, 2007, the member may repay all or part of the amount previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least eight (8) years after the member’s reentry into state service. Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 8; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 11; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 15; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-11-311.1.
Persons to whom benefits payable in event of death of designated beneficiary.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, where benefits are payable to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries and the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided by the member on the most recent form filed with the system are deceased or otherwise disqualified at the time such benefits become payable, the following persons, in descending order of precedence, shall be eligible to receive such benefits:

The surviving spouse of the member or retiree;

The children of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the member or retiree;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the member or retiree’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the member or retiree’s estate.

Any monthly benefits payable to a beneficiary who dies prior to cashing his or her final check(s) and/or any additional benefits payable pursuant to Section 25-11-112 still payable at the death of a beneficiary receiving monthly benefits shall be paid as follows:

The surviving spouse of the beneficiary;

The children of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the beneficiary;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the beneficiary’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the beneficiary’s estate.

In the event no claim is made by any individual listed in subsection (2) of this section, a distribution may be made pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Payment under the provisions above shall bar recovery by any other person of the benefits distributed. Payment of benefits made to one or more members of a class of individuals are made on behalf of all members of the class. Any members of the class coming forward after payment is made must look to those who received the payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-11-312.
Acceptance of eligible rollover distribution or direct transfer of funds from qualified plan in payment of costs to reinstate previously withdrawn service credit.

From and after July 1, 2000, subject to the rules adopted by the board, the supplemental legislative retirement plan shall accept an eligible rollover distribution or a direct transfer of funds from another eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account, in payment of all or a portion of the cost to reinstate previously withdrawn service credit as permitted by the plan. The plan may only accept rollover payments in an amount equal to or less than the balance due for reinstatement of service credit. The rules adopted by the board of trustees shall condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another eligible retirement plan or an individual retirement account on the receipt of information necessary to enable the plan to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2002).

§ 25-11-313.
Employer to pay required member contributions; tax treatment; funding; retirement treatment.

The employer shall pick up the member contributions required by this article for all compensation earned on and after July 1, 1989, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and the Mississippi Income Tax Code. However, the employer shall continue to withhold federal and state income taxes based upon such contributions until the Internal Revenue Service or the federal courts rule that, pursuant to Section 414(h) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, these contributions shall not be included as gross income of the member until such time as they are distributed or made available. The employer shall pay these member contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to the member. The employer may pick up these contributions by a reduction in the cash salary of the member, or by offset against future salary increase, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and offset against future salary increase. If member contributions are picked up they shall be treated for all purposes of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan in the same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made prior to the date picked up.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 25-11-315.
Credit for prior service.

Any member of the State Legislature or the President of the Senate who becomes a member of the plan on July 1, 1989, shall be eligible for prior service as a member of the State Legislature or as President of the Senate. Each member shall submit to the board a verification of prior service as a member of the State Legislature or as President of the Senate. Upon receipt of that prior service statement, the board shall issue a prior service certificate certifying to each member the length of prior service for which credit has been allowed on the basis of the statement of service. Additional prior service regulations in force shall be those found in Section 25-11-101 et seq.

Any member of the State Legislature or the President of the Senate who becomes a member of this plan after July 1, 1989, but before July 1, 2007, shall not be allowed prior service unless the member serves as a member of the State Legislature or as President of the Senate for a minimum of four (4) years and contributes to the plan for a minimum period of four (4) years.

Any member of the State Legislature or the President of the Senate who becomes a member of this plan on or after July 1, 2007, shall not be allowed prior service unless the member serves as a member of the State Legislature or as President of the Senate for a minimum of eight (8) years and contributes to the plan for a minimum period of eight (8) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-11-317.
Administration of supplemental legislative retirement plan.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the plan and for making effective the provisions hereof are vested in the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi.

The board shall invest all funds in accordance with Section 25-11-121.

The board shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical advisor of the board on matters regarding the operation of the plan and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

At least once in each two-year period following the date of establishment, the actuary shall make an actuarial investigation into the mortality, service and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the plan and shall make a valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the plan.

On the basis of regular interest and tables last adopted by the board, the actuary shall make biennial valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the plan.

The board shall keep such data as shall be necessary for the actuarial valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the plan and for checking the experience of the plan.

The board shall determine from time to time the rate of regular interest for use in all calculations, with the rate of five percent (5%) per annum applicable unless changed by the board.

Subject to the limitations hereof, the board from time to time shall establish rules and regulations for the administration of the plan and for the transaction of business.

The board shall keep a record of all its proceedings under this article which shall be open to public inspection, except for individual member records. The system shall not disclose the name, address or contents of any individual member records without the prior written consent of the individual to whom the record pertains.

The Executive Secretary of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall serve as the executive secretary of the plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 25-11-319.
Exemptions from taxation, execution, and assignment; deductions from retirement allowances for payment of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance.

The right of a person to an annuity, a retirement allowance or benefit, or to the return of contributions, or to any optional benefit or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of the Supplemental Legislative Retirement Plan, and the monies in the plan created by this article, are exempt from any state or municipal tax, and exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment or any other process whatsoever, and shall be unassignable except as specifically otherwise provided in this article.

Any retired member or beneficiary receiving a retirement allowance or benefit under this article may authorize the system to make deductions from the retirement allowance or benefit for the payment of employer or system sponsored group life or health insurance. The deductions authorized under this subsection shall be subject to rules and regulations adopted by the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 303, § 12; Laws, 1990, ch. 523, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 523, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 531, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.